test/tools/stress.random-lexicons-100.lexc
LEXICON V57	
+V57:öqzu	Modes ;
+V57:ökmv	Modes ;
+V57:öoåv	Modes ;
+V57:öcnj	Modes ;
+V57:önnj	Modes ;
+V57:ögbp	Modes ;
+V57:özäo	Modes ;
+V57:öåko	Modes ;
+V57:öael	Modes ;
+V57:övkq	Modes ;
+V57:ööwf	Modes ;
+V57:ööuy	Modes ;
+V57:ösbi	Modes ;
+V57:öltr	Modes ;
+V57:öimn	Modes ;
+V57:ökqp	Modes ;
+V57:öcvy	Modes ;
+V57:öjöu	Modes ;
+V57:öwdo	Modes ;
+V57:öåöx	Modes ;
+V57:ödiö	Modes ;
+V57:öötc	Modes ;
+V57:öltt	Modes ;
+V57:öxäy	Modes ;
+V57:öare	Modes ;
+V57:ömcz	Modes ;
+V57:öcyk	Modes ;
+V57:öbff	Modes ;
+V57:ödcn	Modes ;
+V57:öduh	Modes ;
+V57:öubc	Modes ;
+V57:önhs	Modes ;
+V57:öltp	Modes ;
+V57:ömmz	Modes ;
+V57:örum	Modes ;
+V57:öiao	Modes ;
+V57:ödvk	Modes ;
+V57:öimv	Modes ;
+V57:övwb	Modes ;
+V57:öypp	Modes ;
+V57:ökuå	Modes ;
+V57:öhxå	Modes ;
+V57:öycq	Modes ;
+V57:öfhå	Modes ;
+V57:öpqä	Modes ;
+V57:öepf	Modes ;
+V57:öldx	Modes ;
+V57:örkh	Modes ;
+V57:ögpä	Modes ;
+V57:ömek	Modes ;
+V57:ölih	Modes ;
+V57:öyfm	Modes ;
+V57:örwn	Modes ;
+V57:öumw	Modes ;
+V57:övai	Modes ;
+V57:öisr	Modes ;
+V57:örpä	Modes ;
+V57:ölkö	Modes ;
+V57:öwfa	Modes ;
+V57:öeyn	Modes ;
+V57:öhjc	Modes ;
+V57:öäha	Modes ;
+V57:öceh	Modes ;
+V57:ökwå	Modes ;
+V57:öotg	Modes ;
+V57:öålb	Modes ;
+V57:örzn	Modes ;
+V57:öqkn	Modes ;
+V57:ödqx	Modes ;
+V57:öärb	Modes ;
+V57:öpdö	Modes ;
+V57:öiåt	Modes ;
+V57:öåxh	Modes ;
+V57:ökåx	Modes ;
+V57:ötgl	Modes ;
+V57:öeyf	Modes ;
+V57:ösip	Modes ;
+V57:öwtx	Modes ;
+V57:öirt	Modes ;
+V57:övoe	Modes ;
+V57:öigm	Modes ;
+V57:ödyå	Modes ;
+V57:özöy	Modes ;
+V57:öyrh	Modes ;
+V57:öutg	Modes ;
+V57:ötoh	Modes ;
+V57:ömga	Modes ;
+V57:ööfq	Modes ;
+V57:öovä	Modes ;
+V57:ölvy	Modes ;
+V57:öpze	Modes ;
+V57:ödlg	Modes ;
+V57:ölöw	Modes ;
+V57:ölwn	Modes ;
+V57:öemv	Modes ;
+V57:ökkk	Modes ;
+V57:öcäw	Modes ;
+V57:övsz	Modes ;
+V57:öxoä	Modes ;


LEXICON V58	
+V58:lvwa	Modes ;
+V58:lgra	Modes ;
+V58:ljpl	Modes ;
+V58:lfäw	Modes ;
+V58:lvjx	Modes ;
+V58:lriu	Modes ;
+V58:lfpz	Modes ;
+V58:ldis	Modes ;
+V58:löng	Modes ;
+V58:lbur	Modes ;
+V58:lree	Modes ;
+V58:ltqe	Modes ;
+V58:lhjb	Modes ;
+V58:llfm	Modes ;
+V58:lvöy	Modes ;
+V58:lxäf	Modes ;
+V58:lnqf	Modes ;
+V58:laas	Modes ;
+V58:lzqå	Modes ;
+V58:lavn	Modes ;
+V58:llzx	Modes ;
+V58:lfqs	Modes ;
+V58:lqzn	Modes ;
+V58:lbnc	Modes ;
+V58:lsfc	Modes ;
+V58:lvxd	Modes ;
+V58:lcot	Modes ;
+V58:lvvd	Modes ;
+V58:lxgs	Modes ;
+V58:ldwm	Modes ;
+V58:lfmq	Modes ;
+V58:lvxj	Modes ;
+V58:lxdy	Modes ;
+V58:lcqa	Modes ;
+V58:laug	Modes ;
+V58:låsc	Modes ;
+V58:lgbn	Modes ;
+V58:ljze	Modes ;
+V58:lcbö	Modes ;
+V58:lgzu	Modes ;
+V58:lefl	Modes ;
+V58:lbac	Modes ;
+V58:lhmf	Modes ;
+V58:lley	Modes ;
+V58:lkqö	Modes ;
+V58:lmok	Modes ;
+V58:lxkw	Modes ;
+V58:lalö	Modes ;
+V58:ltyb	Modes ;
+V58:lpyj	Modes ;
+V58:löoo	Modes ;
+V58:lxue	Modes ;
+V58:lkev	Modes ;
+V58:lxqg	Modes ;
+V58:lhso	Modes ;
+V58:lrhh	Modes ;
+V58:lold	Modes ;
+V58:loxe	Modes ;
+V58:lcru	Modes ;
+V58:luzf	Modes ;
+V58:lijt	Modes ;
+V58:lrtq	Modes ;
+V58:lkxl	Modes ;
+V58:lkön	Modes ;
+V58:lqkv	Modes ;
+V58:ljdt	Modes ;
+V58:lykx	Modes ;
+V58:lorc	Modes ;
+V58:lqsz	Modes ;
+V58:lvbg	Modes ;
+V58:löeg	Modes ;
+V58:lynd	Modes ;
+V58:lsop	Modes ;
+V58:lfät	Modes ;
+V58:lnvt	Modes ;
+V58:lkaq	Modes ;
+V58:liix	Modes ;
+V58:lyfm	Modes ;
+V58:loog	Modes ;
+V58:lttx	Modes ;
+V58:likb	Modes ;
+V58:lzdf	Modes ;
+V58:lbvä	Modes ;
+V58:lewö	Modes ;
+V58:lwuf	Modes ;
+V58:loåt	Modes ;
+V58:lxäp	Modes ;
+V58:lxua	Modes ;
+V58:lggk	Modes ;
+V58:lyuz	Modes ;
+V58:lxrk	Modes ;
+V58:lyvh	Modes ;
+V58:lpuq	Modes ;
+V58:ljtl	Modes ;
+V58:lpkä	Modes ;
+V58:lcun	Modes ;
+V58:llkd	Modes ;
+V58:lgxz	Modes ;
+V58:lzrq	Modes ;


LEXICON V59	
+V59:mkau	Modes ;
+V59:mndm	Modes ;
+V59:maeå	Modes ;
+V59:mbzq	Modes ;
+V59:mdwå	Modes ;
+V59:mpmb	Modes ;
+V59:mpöz	Modes ;
+V59:mfkq	Modes ;
+V59:msyf	Modes ;
+V59:mxia	Modes ;
+V59:mrvä	Modes ;
+V59:mhao	Modes ;
+V59:mcad	Modes ;
+V59:mäci	Modes ;
+V59:mpcz	Modes ;
+V59:mgäö	Modes ;
+V59:mhes	Modes ;
+V59:mhnl	Modes ;
+V59:mfhb	Modes ;
+V59:mqvj	Modes ;
+V59:mözm	Modes ;
+V59:mcåt	Modes ;
+V59:mxgz	Modes ;
+V59:mkqc	Modes ;
+V59:mäfh	Modes ;
+V59:mwko	Modes ;
+V59:mumä	Modes ;
+V59:mspp	Modes ;
+V59:mnks	Modes ;
+V59:mbrk	Modes ;
+V59:månm	Modes ;
+V59:mpad	Modes ;
+V59:myoe	Modes ;
+V59:mhag	Modes ;
+V59:mxgt	Modes ;
+V59:mnyy	Modes ;
+V59:mret	Modes ;
+V59:matd	Modes ;
+V59:mojh	Modes ;
+V59:mmeå	Modes ;
+V59:mjkp	Modes ;
+V59:mäöä	Modes ;
+V59:mrqb	Modes ;
+V59:mfaw	Modes ;
+V59:moer	Modes ;
+V59:makk	Modes ;
+V59:mgbg	Modes ;
+V59:mrld	Modes ;
+V59:mufv	Modes ;
+V59:mmfö	Modes ;
+V59:moeg	Modes ;
+V59:mlpw	Modes ;
+V59:mloö	Modes ;
+V59:mlow	Modes ;
+V59:måiv	Modes ;
+V59:mwau	Modes ;
+V59:mtsi	Modes ;
+V59:mwbå	Modes ;
+V59:mhny	Modes ;
+V59:migä	Modes ;
+V59:moos	Modes ;
+V59:mmmw	Modes ;
+V59:måel	Modes ;
+V59:moko	Modes ;
+V59:mfll	Modes ;
+V59:mddt	Modes ;
+V59:mäla	Modes ;
+V59:mjzc	Modes ;
+V59:msff	Modes ;
+V59:mfhi	Modes ;
+V59:muem	Modes ;
+V59:micq	Modes ;
+V59:mqlu	Modes ;
+V59:muqå	Modes ;
+V59:mrds	Modes ;
+V59:mräa	Modes ;
+V59:mror	Modes ;
+V59:mmjg	Modes ;
+V59:muhb	Modes ;
+V59:mesb	Modes ;
+V59:mwhu	Modes ;
+V59:mzdj	Modes ;
+V59:mfut	Modes ;
+V59:mnät	Modes ;
+V59:mqoh	Modes ;
+V59:mmab	Modes ;
+V59:mbkd	Modes ;
+V59:mlip	Modes ;
+V59:mrrg	Modes ;
+V59:mywf	Modes ;
+V59:mzyö	Modes ;
+V59:mlnu	Modes ;
+V59:mhrw	Modes ;
+V59:mcwk	Modes ;
+V59:mxkt	Modes ;
+V59:mcåo	Modes ;
+V59:mfeo	Modes ;
+V59:mxse	Modes ;
+V59:mvoz	Modes ;


LEXICON V60	
+V6%0:nhvx	Modes ;
+V6%0:nddd	Modes ;
+V6%0:nndu	Modes ;
+V6%0:nvje	Modes ;
+V6%0:nåbe	Modes ;
+V6%0:ntpy	Modes ;
+V6%0:nnbä	Modes ;
+V6%0:nmil	Modes ;
+V6%0:nbqt	Modes ;
+V6%0:nöåw	Modes ;
+V6%0:npsm	Modes ;
+V6%0:näbg	Modes ;
+V6%0:nysz	Modes ;
+V6%0:nbcp	Modes ;
+V6%0:nfpt	Modes ;
+V6%0:ngsm	Modes ;
+V6%0:nkqw	Modes ;
+V6%0:njtd	Modes ;
+V6%0:nsog	Modes ;
+V6%0:nqtö	Modes ;
+V6%0:nääi	Modes ;
+V6%0:nuej	Modes ;
+V6%0:nxel	Modes ;
+V6%0:njåf	Modes ;
+V6%0:nmob	Modes ;
+V6%0:nhpm	Modes ;
+V6%0:nsqd	Modes ;
+V6%0:nanå	Modes ;
+V6%0:ngcv	Modes ;
+V6%0:nadi	Modes ;
+V6%0:nswy	Modes ;
+V6%0:nnwm	Modes ;
+V6%0:nffr	Modes ;
+V6%0:neor	Modes ;
+V6%0:nuhg	Modes ;
+V6%0:nfph	Modes ;
+V6%0:nakb	Modes ;
+V6%0:nhyö	Modes ;
+V6%0:nkqc	Modes ;
+V6%0:nhvp	Modes ;
+V6%0:nvpi	Modes ;
+V6%0:nåym	Modes ;
+V6%0:nqfq	Modes ;
+V6%0:ngqö	Modes ;
+V6%0:nnoz	Modes ;
+V6%0:nzbo	Modes ;
+V6%0:nmpb	Modes ;
+V6%0:nzzq	Modes ;
+V6%0:npnk	Modes ;
+V6%0:nclh	Modes ;
+V6%0:ndpg	Modes ;
+V6%0:nnkk	Modes ;
+V6%0:nåsw	Modes ;
+V6%0:nvri	Modes ;
+V6%0:nöhz	Modes ;
+V6%0:nfxö	Modes ;
+V6%0:nqsv	Modes ;
+V6%0:nycn	Modes ;
+V6%0:nmwt	Modes ;
+V6%0:nuöm	Modes ;
+V6%0:nbqå	Modes ;
+V6%0:numm	Modes ;
+V6%0:npcy	Modes ;
+V6%0:nogi	Modes ;
+V6%0:nnmä	Modes ;
+V6%0:nxäz	Modes ;
+V6%0:nfub	Modes ;
+V6%0:nzlj	Modes ;
+V6%0:nmcq	Modes ;
+V6%0:nrzö	Modes ;
+V6%0:npäz	Modes ;
+V6%0:nwjc	Modes ;
+V6%0:nlwk	Modes ;
+V6%0:nvyw	Modes ;
+V6%0:nåft	Modes ;
+V6%0:nnbä	Modes ;
+V6%0:nztw	Modes ;
+V6%0:nhax	Modes ;
+V6%0:nvtä	Modes ;
+V6%0:nfft	Modes ;
+V6%0:nöng	Modes ;
+V6%0:nhiy	Modes ;
+V6%0:nyem	Modes ;
+V6%0:ndzl	Modes ;
+V6%0:nqrö	Modes ;
+V6%0:nåqw	Modes ;
+V6%0:nwld	Modes ;
+V6%0:nxov	Modes ;
+V6%0:nhtp	Modes ;
+V6%0:neqw	Modes ;
+V6%0:ngdx	Modes ;
+V6%0:nhcf	Modes ;
+V6%0:nsvs	Modes ;
+V6%0:nuht	Modes ;
+V6%0:naqa	Modes ;
+V6%0:nauh	Modes ;
+V6%0:nlwd	Modes ;
+V6%0:nbcp	Modes ;
+V6%0:näib	Modes ;

LEXICON Root
ö V57 ;
a V58 ;
b V59 ;
c V60 ;
